Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 22.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-122
Correcting filed record.

(ULLCA 206) (a) A limited
liability company or foreign limited liability company may deliver to the
Secretary of State for filing a statement of correction to correct a record
previously delivered by the company to the Secretary of State and filed by
the Secretary of State, if at the time of filing the record contained inaccurate
information or was defectively signed.

(b) A statement of correction
under subsection (a) of this section may not state a delayed effective date
and must:

(1)
describe the record to be corrected, including its filing date, or attach
a copy of the record as filed;

(2) specify the inaccurate information and the reason
it is inaccurate or the manner in which the signing was defective; and

(3) correct the defective
signature or inaccurate information.

(c) When filed by the Secretary of State, a statement
of correction under subsection (a) of this section is effective retroactively
as of the effective date of the record the statement corrects, but the statement
is effective when filed:

(1)
for the purposes of subsection (d) of section 21-103; and

(2) as to persons that
previously relied on the uncorrected record and would be adversely affected
by the retroactive effect.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 22.